Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1980.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; CENTER OF AMERICAN INDIAN AND MINORITY HEALTH.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to support the Center of American Indian and Minority Health at the University of Minnesota Medical School, Duluth campus. new text end